test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maeaeqdwltwb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mǟʼdõltõb: # Noun 160 'eng /est mälestis/fin' - full paradigm
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Nom: mǟʼdõltõb
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Gen: mǟʼdõltõb
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Par: mǟʼdõltõbt
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Dat: mǟʼdõltõbõn
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ins: mǟʼdõltõbõks
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ill: mǟʼdõltõbõ
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Sg+Ela: mǟʼdõltõbst
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Nom: mǟʼdõltõbõd
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Gen: mǟʼdõltõbõd
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Par: mǟʼdõltõbidi
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Dat: mǟʼdõltõbõdõn
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ins: mǟʼdõltõbõdõks
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ill: mǟʼdõltõbiž
     mǟʼdõltõb+N+Pl+Ela: mǟʼdõltõbist
